Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4601
Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act, how cited.

Sections 44-4601 to 44-4617 shall be known and may be cited as the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and Regulation Act.

Laws 2022, LB767, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB198, § 1.